District of Columbia statutes.
8-203

Failure to make required connections.

If the owner or owners of any such lot neglect or refuse to make such connections as are required by § 8-201 within 30 days after the receipt of such notice, such owner or owners shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, on conviction in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, be punished by a fine of not less than $1 nor more than $5 for each day he, she, or they fail or neglect to make such connections. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions if the owners of any lots neglect or refuse to make the connections required by § 8-201 within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 19, 1896, 29 Stat. 126, ch. 206, § 3
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570 Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 477, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 6-403.
1973 Ed., § 6-403.
Near the middle of the second sentence, “connections” has been substituted for “corrections” to correct an error in D.C. Law 6-42.